Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30 INCOME TAX
§ 63-3029B. Income tax credit for capital investment.

At the election of the taxpayer there shall be allowed, subject to the applicable limitations provided herein as a credit against the income tax imposed by chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, an amount equal to the sum of:

The tax credit carryovers; and

The tax credit for the taxable year.

The maximum allowable amount of the credit for the current taxable year shall be three percent (3%) of the amount of qualified investments made during the taxable year.

As used in this section “qualified investment” means certain property which:

Is eligible for the federal investment tax credit, as defined in sections 46(c) and 48 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to the limitations provided for certain regulated companies in section 46(f) of the Internal Revenue Code and is not a motor vehicle under eight thousand (8,000) pounds gross weight; or
(a)(i) Is eligible for the federal investment tax credit, as defined in sections 46(c) and 48 of the Internal Revenue Code subject to the limitations provided for certain regulated companies in section 46(f) of the Internal Revenue Code and is not a motor vehicle under eight thousand (8,000) pounds gross weight; or

Is qualified broadband equipment as defined in section 63-3029I, Idaho Code; and

To have ceased to qualify during the recapture period, or

To be otherwise not qualified for the election,

Is acquired, constructed, reconstructed, erected or placed into service after December 31, 1981; and

Has a situs in Idaho as determined under subsection (9) of this section.

For qualified investments placed in service in 2003 and thereafter, a taxpayer, other than a person whose rate of charge or rate of return, or both, is regulated or limited according to federal or state law, may elect, in lieu of the credit provided by this section, a two (2) year exemption from all taxes on personal property on the qualified investment. The exemption from personal property tax shall apply to the year the election is filed as provided in this section and the immediately following year. The election provided by this paragraph is available only to a taxpayer whose Idaho taxable income, before application of net operating losses carried back or forward, in the second preceding taxable year in which the investment is placed in service is negative.
(4)(a) For qualified investments placed in service in 2003 and thereafter, a taxpayer, other than a person whose rate of charge or rate of return, or both, is regulated or limited according to federal or state law, may elect, in lieu of the credit provided by this section, a two (2) year exemption from all taxes on personal property on the qualified investment. The exemption from personal property tax shall apply to the year the election is filed as provided in this section and the immediately following year. The election provided by this paragraph is available only to a taxpayer whose Idaho taxable income, before application of net operating losses carried back or forward, in the second preceding taxable year in which the investment is placed in service is negative.

The election shall be made in the form prescribed by the state tax commission and shall include a specific description and location of all qualified investments placed into service and located in the jurisdiction of the assessing authority, a designation of the specific assets for which the exemption is claimed, and such other information as the state tax commission may require. The election must be made by including the election form with the listing of personal property required by section 63-302, Idaho Code, or, in the case of operating property assessed under chapter 4, title 63, Idaho Code, with the operator’s statement required by section 63-404, Idaho Code. Once made the election is irrevocable. If no election is made, the election is not otherwise available. A copy of the election form must also be attached to the original income tax return due for the taxable year in which the claim was made.

The state tax commission and the various county assessors are authorized to exchange information as necessary to properly coordinate the exemption provided in this subsection. Information disclosed to county officials under this subsection may be used only to determine the validity or amount of a taxpayer’s entitlement to the exemption provided in this section, and is not otherwise subject to public disclosure as provided in section 74-107, Idaho Code.

In the event that an investment in regard to which the election under this subsection was made is determined by the state tax commission:
(i) To not be a qualified investment, or

The benefit to be recaptured in subsection (4) (d) of this section shall be computed in the manner required in subsection (7) of this section and such recapture amount shall be subject to assessment in the same manner as a deficiency in tax under this chapter. For purposes of calculating the recapture, the property tax benefit shall be:

In the case of locally assessed property located in a single county or nonapportioned centrally assessed property, the market value of exempted property times the average property tax levy for that county in the year or years for which the exemption was claimed.

In the case of other centrally assessed property and property located in more than one (1) county, the market value of exempted property times the average urban property tax levy of the state as determined by the state tax commission in each of the years for which the exemption was claimed.

In the event that a recapture of the exemption is required under this subsection (4), the person claiming the exemption shall report the event to the state tax commission in the manner the state tax commission may by rule require. The report shall be due no later than the due date of that person’s income tax return under this chapter for the taxable year in which the event occurs. The recapture amount is due and payable with the report. Any amount of recapture not paid is a deficiency within the meaning of section 63-3044, Idaho Code.

All moneys collected by the state tax commission pursuant to this subsection, which amounts are continuously appropriated for this purpose, shall be deposited with the state treasurer and placed in the state refund account, as provided by section 63-3067, Idaho Code, to be remitted to the county within which the property was located that was not a qualified investment or ceased to qualify during the recapture period. The county shall distribute this remittance to all appropriate taxing districts based on the proportion each appropriate taxing district’s levy is to the total of all the levies of the taxing districts for the tax code area where the property was located for each year the exemption was granted. If any taxing district is dissolved or disincorporated, the proportionate share of the remittance to be distributed to that taxing district shall be deposited in the county current expense fund.

For purposes of the limitation provided by section 63-802, Idaho Code, moneys received pursuant to this subsection shall be treated as property tax revenue by taxing districts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the amount of the credit allowed shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the tax liability of the taxpayer. The tax liability of the taxpayer shall be the tax after deducting the credit allowed by section 63-3029, Idaho Code.

If the sum of credit carryovers from the credit allowed by subsection (2) of this section and the amount of credit for the taxable year from the credit allowed by subsection (2) of this section exceed the limitation imposed by subsection (5) of this section for the current taxable year, the excess attributable to the current taxable year’s credit shall be an investment credit carryover to the fourteen (14) succeeding taxable years so long as the qualified investment property for which the unused credit was granted otherwise remains a qualified investment as determined under subsection (3) of this section in each of the taxable years during the recapture period. In the case of a group of corporations filing a combined report under section 63-3027, Idaho Code, or sections 63-3027B through 63-3027E, Idaho Code, credit earned by one (1) member of the group but not used by that member may be used by another member of the group, subject to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section, instead of carried over. The entire amount of unused credit shall be carried forward to the earliest of the succeeding years, wherein the oldest available unused credit shall be used first. For a combined group of corporations, credit carried forward may be claimed by any member of the group unless the member who earned the credit is no longer included in the combined group.
(7) Any recapture of the credit allowed by subsection (2) of this section on property disposed of or ceasing to qualify, prior to the close of the recapture period, shall be determined according to the applicable recapture provisions of the Internal Revenue Code. In the case of a unitary group of corporations, the increase in tax due to the recapture of investment tax credit must be reported by the member of the group who earned the credit regardless of which member claimed the credit against tax.

The amount of each qualified investment in a specific asset shall be separately computed based on the percentage of the actual use of the property in Idaho by using a measure of the use, such as total miles or total machine hours, that most accurately reflects the beneficial use during the taxable year in which it is first acquired, constructed, reconstructed, erected or placed into service; provided, that the asset is placed in service more than ninety (90) days before the end of the taxable year. In the case of assets acquired, constructed, reconstructed, erected or placed into service within ninety (90) days prior to the end of the taxable year in which the investment first qualifies, the measure of the use of that asset within Idaho for that year shall be based upon the percentage of use in Idaho during the first ninety (90) days of use of the asset;

The investment in qualified property used both inside and outside Idaho during the taxable year in which it is first acquired, constructed, reconstructed, erected or placed into service shall be multiplied by the percent of the investment that would be included in the numerator of the Idaho property factor determined pursuant to section 63-3027, Idaho Code, for the same year.

the taxpayer shall be subject to recapture of the property tax benefit.

(8) For the purpose of determining whether property placed in service is a “qualified investment” as defined in subsection (3) of this section, the provisions of section 49 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be disregarded. “Qualified investment” shall not include any amount for which a deduction is allowed under section 168(k) or section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code in computing Idaho taxable income.

(9) For purposes of this section, property has a situs in Idaho during a taxable year if it is used in Idaho at any time during the taxable year. Property not used in Idaho during a taxable year does not have a situs in Idaho in the taxable year during which the property is not used in Idaho or in any subsequent taxable year. The Idaho situs of property must be established by records maintained by the taxpayer which are created reasonably contemporaneously with the use of the property.

(10) In the case of property used both in and outside Idaho, the taxpayer, electing to claim the credit provided in this section, must elect to compute the qualified investment in property with a situs in Idaho for all such investments first qualifying during that year in one (1), but only one (1), of the following ways:

(11) References to sections 46, 48 and 49 of the “Internal Revenue Code” mean those sections as they existed in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 prior to November 5, 1990.

§ 63-3029C. Income tax credit for certain charitable contributions — Limitation.

At the election of the taxpayer, there shall be allowed, subject to the applicable limitations provided herein, as a credit against the income tax imposed by chapter 30, title 63, Idaho Code, an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the aggregate amount of charitable contributions made by such taxpayer during the year to the anchor house or its foundation, to the children’s home society of Idaho, inc., to the Idaho youth ranch or its foundation, to kinderhaven or its foundation, to the women’s and children’s alliance or its foundation, to children’s village, inc. or its foundation, to Idaho drug free youth, inc. or its foundation, to gem youth services or its foundation, to the hope house, inc. or its foundation, to the north Idaho children’s home or its foundation, to the shepherd’s home, inc. or its foundation, to a project safe place located within the state of Idaho, to the learning lab, inc. or its foundation, to a center for independent living located within the state of Idaho, to project P.A.T.C.H., planned assistance for troubled children, to a nonprofit substance abuse center licensed by the department of health and welfare, or to a nonprofit rehabilitation facility located within the state of Idaho or its foundation.

In the case of a taxpayer other than a corporation, the amount allowable as a credit under this section for any taxable year shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of such taxpayer’s total income tax liability imposed by section 63-3024, Idaho Code, for the year, or one hundred dollars ($100), whichever is less.

In the case of a corporation, the amount allowable as a credit under this section for any taxable year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of such corporation’s total income or franchise tax liability imposed by sections 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, for the year, or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is less.

For the purposes of this section, “center for independent living” shall mean a private, nonprofit, nonresidential organization in which at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the principal governing board, management and staff are individuals with disabilities and that:

Is designed and operated within a local community by individuals with disabilities;

Provides an array of independent living services and programs; and

Is cross-disability.

For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit rehabilitation facility” means only a facility that is accredited by the commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities or another accreditation organization recognized by the state of Idaho.

§ 63-3029D. Tax credit for qualified equipment utilizing postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste.

For income tax years commencing on and after January 1, 1994, there shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter for each taxpayer who purchases qualified equipment on and after January 1, 1994.

The credit provided pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the costs incurred by the taxpayer for purchases of qualified equipment and shall be claimed in the income tax year in which at least ninety percent (90%) of the total production of such qualified equipment is used by the taxpayer to manufacture products utilizing postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste. In no event shall the tax credit be more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per tax year.

If the amount of the credit provided pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section exceeds the amount of income taxes otherwise due on the income of the taxpayer in the income tax year for which the credit is being claimed, the amount of the credit not used as an offset against income taxes in such income tax year may be carried forward as a credit against subsequent years’ income tax liability for a period not exceeding seven (7) years and shall be applied first to the earliest income tax years possible. Any amount of the credit which is not used after such period shall not be refundable to the taxpayer.

As used in this section:

“Collection” means:

The acquisition of materials from businesses or the general public through purchase or donation, including the organization of systems for such acquisitions;

The preparation of materials for over-the-road transportation through cleaning, densification by shredding, baling, or any other method, or coalescence, including the organization of systems for such preparation; or

The transportation of postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste between separate geographical locations.

“Costs” means the amount of the purchase price or the amount of the annual lease payment.

“Postconsumer waste” or “postindustrial waste” means only those products and materials consisting of paper, glass or plastic generated by businesses or consumers which have served their intended end use or usefulness and either have been or would normally be disposed of as solid waste except for the fact that they are separated from solid waste for purposes of collection, recycling or reuse. “Postconsumer waste” or “postindustrial waste” shall not include radioactive waste, as defined in this section, or hazardous waste, as defined in chapter 44, title 39, Idaho Code.

“Product” means any material resulting from a manufacturing process and offered for sale to the private or public sector which is composed of at least fifty percent (50%) postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste. “Product” does not include any shredded material unless such shredded material is incorporated directly into the manufacturing process.

“Purchase” means:

Any transaction under which title to qualified equipment is transferred for consideration; or
(ii) Any lease contract for qualified equipment for a period of at least three (3) years regardless of whether title to qualified equipment is transferred at the end of such period.

“Qualified equipment” means machinery or equipment located within Idaho which has at least an estimated three (3) years’ useful life and of which at least ninety percent (90%) of the total production thereof is used by the taxpayer to manufacture products utilizing postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste. “Qualified equipment” shall not include any machinery or equipment which is used for the collection of postconsumer waste or postindustrial waste.

“Radioactive waste” or “nuclear waste” means a waste or combination of wastes of a solid, liquid, semisolid or contained gaseous form which contains radiation.

Any recomputation of the credit allowed in subsection (2) of this section on property disposed of or ceasing to qualify, prior to the close of its useful life, shall be determined according to section 47 of the Internal Revenue Code, as such existed on November 5, 1990.

§ 63-3029E. Definitions

Construction of terms. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2012, ch. 233, § 3, effective January 1, 2017.

§ 63-3029F. Claim of right income repayment adjustments.

Subject to the provisions of this section, a credit against the taxes otherwise due shall be allowed to a taxpayer for a claim of right income repayment adjustment.

The credit under this section shall be allowed only if the taxpayer’s federal tax liability is determined under section 1341(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The amount of the credit shall equal the difference between:

The taxpayer’s actual Idaho state income tax liability for the tax year for which the claim of right was included in gross income for federal tax purposes; and

The taxpayer’s Idaho state income tax liability for that tax year, had the claim of right income not been included in gross income for federal tax purposes.

A credit under this section shall be allowed only for the tax year for which the taxpayer’s federal tax liability is determined under section 1341 of the Internal Revenue Code for federal tax purposes.

If the amount allowable as a credit under this section, when added to the sum of other amounts allowable as a payment of tax and other refundable credit amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed (reduced by any nonrefundable credits allowed for the tax year), then the excess shall be treated as an overpayment of tax and shall be refunded or applied in the same manner as other tax overpayments.

As used in this section, “claim of right income” means:

An item included in federal gross income for a prior tax year because it appeared that the taxpayer had an unrestricted right to the item; and

An item for which the taxpayer’s federal tax liability is adjusted under section 1341 of the Internal Revenue Code because the taxpayer did not have an unrestricted right to the item of gross income.

§ 63-3029G. Credits for research activities conducted in this state — Carry forward.

Subject to the limitations of this section, there shall be allowed to a taxpayer a nonrefundable credit against taxes imposed by sections 63-3024, 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, for increasing research activities in Idaho.
(1)(a) Subject to the limitations of this section, there shall be allowed to a taxpayer a nonrefundable credit against taxes imposed by sections 63-3024, 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, for increasing research activities in Idaho.

The credit allowed by subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be the sum of:

Five percent (5%) of the excess of qualified research expenses for research conducted in Idaho over the base amount; and

Five percent (5%) basic research payments allowable under subsection (e) of section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code for basic research conducted in Idaho.

The credit allowed by subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be computed without regard to the calculation of the alternative incremental credit provided for in section 41(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code or the alternative simplified credit provided for in section 41(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.

As used in this section:

The terms “qualified research expenses,” “qualified research,” “basic research payments” and “basic research” shall be as defined in section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code except that the research must be conducted in Idaho.

The term “base amount” shall mean an amount calculated as provided in sections 41(c) and 41(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, except that:

A taxpayer’s gross receipts include only those gross receipts attributable to sources within this state as provided in subsections (q) and (r) of section 63-3027, Idaho Code; and

Notwithstanding section 41(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, for purposes of calculating the base amount, a taxpayer:

May elect to be treated as a start-up company as provided in section 41(c)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, regardless of whether the taxpayer meets the requirements of section 41(c)(3)(B)(i)(I) or (II) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

May not revoke an election to be treated as a start-up company.

The credit allowed by subsection (1)(a) of this section together with any credits carried forward under subsection (5) of this section shall not exceed the amount of tax due under sections 63-3024, 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, after allowance for all other credits permitted by this chapter. When credits earned in more than one (1) taxable year are available, the oldest credits shall be applied first.

In the case of a group of corporations filing a combined report under subsection (t) of section 63-3027, Idaho Code, credit earned by one (1) member of the group but not used by that member may be used by another member of the group. For a combined group of corporations, any member of the group may claim credit carried forward unless the member who earned the credit is no longer included in the combined group.

The credit allowed by subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be claimed for the taxable year during which the taxpayer qualifies for the credit. If the credit exceeds the limitation under subsection (3) of this section, the excess amount may be carried forward for a period that does not exceed the next fourteen (14) taxable years.

§ 63-3029H. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 63-3029I. Income tax credit for investment in broadband equipment.

Subject to the limitations of this section, for taxable years beginning after January 1, 2001, there shall be allowed to a taxpayer a nonrefundable credit against taxes imposed by sections 63-3024, 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, for qualified expenditures in qualified broadband equipment in Idaho.

The credit permitted in subsection (1) of this section shall be three percent (3%) of the qualified investment in qualified broadband equipment in Idaho and shall be in addition to the credit for capital investment permitted by section 63-3029B, Idaho Code.

As used in this section the term:

“Qualified investment” shall be as defined in section 63-3029B, Idaho Code.

“Qualified broadband equipment” means equipment that qualifies for the credit for capital investment permitted by section 63-3029B, Idaho Code, and is capable of transmitting signals at a rate of at least two hundred thousand (200,000) bits per second to a subscriber and at least one hundred twenty-five thousand (125,000) bits per second from a subscriber, and

In the case of a telecommunications carrier, such qualifying equipment shall be necessary to the provision of broadband service and an integral part of a broadband network. “Telecommunications carrier” has the meaning given such term by section 47 U.S.C. 153 of the communications act of 1934, as amended, but does not include a commercial mobile service provider.

In the case of a commercial mobile service carrier, such qualifying equipment shall extend from the subscriber side of the mobile telecommunications switching office to a transmitting/receiving antenna, including such antenna, on the outside of the structure in which the subscriber is located. “Commercial mobile service carrier” means any person authorized to provide commercial mobile radio service to subscribers as defined in section 20.3 of title 47, Code of Federal Regulations (10-1-99 ed.), as amended.

In the case of a cable or open video system operator, such qualifying equipment shall extend from the subscriber’s side of the headend to the outside of the structure in which the subscriber is located. The terms “cable operator” and “open video system operator” have the meanings given such terms by sections 602(5) and 653, respectively, of the communications act of 1934, as amended.

In the case of a satellite carrier or a wireless carrier other than listed above, such qualifying equipment is only that equipment that extends from a transmitting/receiving antenna, including such antenna, which transmits and receives signals to or from multiple subscribers to a transmitting/receiving antenna on the outside of the structure in which the subscriber is located. “Satellite carrier” means any person using the facilities of a satellite or satellite services licensed by the federal communications commission and operating a fixed-satellite service or direct broadcast satellite services to provide point-to-multipoint distribution of signals. “Other wireless carrier” means any person, other than a telecommunications carrier, commercial mobile service carrier, cable operator, open video operator, or satellite carrier, providing broadband services to subscribers through the radio transmission of energy.

In the case of packet switching equipment, such packet equipment installed in connection with other qualifying equipment listed in subsections (3)(b)(i) through (3)(b)(iv) of this section, provided it is the last in a series of equipment that transmits signals to a subscriber or the first in a series of equipment that transmits signals from a subscriber. “Packet switching” means controlling or routing the path of a digital transmission signal which is assembled into packets or cells.
(vi) In the case of multiplexing and demultiplexing equipment, such equipment only to the extent that it is deployed in connection with providing broadband services in locations between packet switching equipment and the structure in which the subscriber is located. “Multiplexing” means the transmission of two (2) or more signals over a communications circuit without regard to the communications technology.

Any property not primarily used to provide services in Idaho to public subscribers is not qualified broadband equipment.

No equipment described in subsections (3)(b)(i) through (3)(b)(vi) of this section shall qualify for the credit provided in subsection (1) of this section until the taxpayer applies to and obtains from the Idaho public utilities commission an order confirming that the installed equipment is qualified broadband equipment. Applications submitted to the commission shall be governed by the commission’s rules of procedure. The commission may issue procedural orders necessary to implement this section.

The credit allowed by subsection (1) of this section together with any credits carried forward under subsection (7) of this section shall not, in any one (1) taxable year, exceed the lesser of:

The amount of tax due under sections 63-3024, 63-3025 and 63-3025A, Idaho Code, after allowance for all other credits permitted by this chapter; or

Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000).

In the case of a group of corporations filing a combined report under subsection (t) of section 63-3027, Idaho Code, credit earned by one (1) member of the group but not used by that member may be used by another member of the group, subject to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, instead of carried over. For a combined group of corporations, credit carried forward may be claimed by any member of the group unless the member who earned the credit is no longer included in the combined group.

If the credit allowed by subsection (1) of this section exceeds the limitation under subsection (5) of this section, the excess amount may be carried forward for a period that does not exceed the next fourteen (14) taxable years.

In the event that qualified broadband equipment upon which the credit allowed by this section has been used ceases to qualify for the credit allowed by section 63-3029B, Idaho Code, or is subject to recapture of that credit, the recapture of credit under this section shall be in the same proportion and subject to the same provisions as the amount of credit required to be recaptured under section 63-3029B, Idaho Code.

Subject to the requirements of this subsection, a taxpayer who earns and is entitled to the credit or to an unused portion of the credit allowed by this section may transfer all or a portion of the unused credit to:
(9)(a) Subject to the requirements of this subsection, a taxpayer who earns and is entitled to the credit or to an unused portion of the credit allowed by this section may transfer all or a portion of the unused credit to:

Another taxpayer required to file a return under this chapter; or

To an intermediary for its use or for resale to a taxpayer required to file a return under this chapter.

In addition to other needed rules, the state tax commission may promulgate rules prescribing, in the case of S corporations, partnerships, trusts or estates, a method of attributing the credit under this section to the shareholders, partners or beneficiaries in proportion to their share of the income from the S corporation, partnership, trust or estate.

When credits earned in more than one (1) taxable year are available, the oldest credits shall be applied first.

In the event of either such a transfer, the transferee may claim the credit on the transferee’s income tax return originally filed during the calendar year in which the transfer takes place and, in the case of carryover of the credit, on the transferee’s returns for the number of years of carryover available to the transferor at the time of the transfer unless earlier exhausted.
(b) Before completing a transfer under this subsection, the transferor shall notify the state tax commission of its intention to transfer the credit and the identity of the transferee. The state tax commission shall provide the transferor with a written statement of the amount of credit available under this section as then appearing in the commission’s records and the number of years the credit may be carried over. The transferee shall attach a copy of the statement to any return in regard to which the transferred credit is claimed.

(c) In the event that after the transfer the state tax commission determines that the amount of credit properly available under this section is less than the amount claimed by the transferor of the credit or that the credit is subject to recapture, the commission shall assess the amount of overstated or recaptured credit as taxes due from the transferor and not the transferee. The assessment shall be made in the manner provided for a deficiency in taxes under this chapter.

§ 63-3029J. Incentive income tax investment credit. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2018, ch. 160, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

§ 63-3029K. Tax credit for live organ donation expenses.

As used in this section:

“Human organ” means human bone marrow or any part of a human including the intestine, kidney, liver, lung or pancreas.

“Live organ donation” means that an individual who is living donates one (1) or more of that individual’s human organs to another human to be transplanted using a medical procedure to the body of the other human.

“Live organ donation expenses” means the total amount of expenses incurred by a taxpayer that are not reimbursed to that taxpayer by any person, are directly related to a live organ donation by the taxpayer or another individual that the taxpayer is allowed to claim as a dependent in accordance with section 151 of the Internal Revenue Code and include travel, lodging or lost wages as defined by rule by the state tax commission.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007, a taxpayer may claim a nonrefundable credit against taxes imposed by this chapter for live organ donation expenses incurred during the taxable year for which the live organ donation occurs in an amount equal to the lesser of the actual amount of the live organ donation expenses or five thousand dollars ($5,000).

If the amount of a tax credit under this section exceeds a taxpayer’s tax liability under this chapter for a taxable year, the amount of the tax credit that exceeds the taxpayer’s income tax liability may be carried forward for a period that does not exceed the next five (5) taxable years.

§ 63-3029L. Child tax credit.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2026, there shall be allowed to a taxpayer a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by this chapter in the amount of two hundred five dollars ($205) with respect to each qualifying child of the taxpayer. For purposes of this section, the term “qualifying child” has the meaning as defined in section 24(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. In no event shall more than one (1) taxpayer be allowed this credit for the same qualifying child. This credit is available only to Idaho residents. Any part-year resident entitled to a credit under this section shall receive a proportional credit reflecting the part of the year in which the part-year resident was domiciled in Idaho.

In the case of divorced parents or parents who do not live together, if the qualifying child is in the custody of one or both of the child’s parents for more than one-half of a calendar year, such child is the qualifying child of the custodial parent for the taxable year beginning during such calendar year. However, the child may be the qualifying child of the noncustodial parent if either of the following requirements are met:

A court of competent jurisdiction has unconditionally awarded, in writing, to the noncustodial parent the tax benefits associated with the child pursuant to section 32-706, Idaho Code, and the noncustodial parent attaches a copy of the court order to the noncustodial parent’s income tax return for the taxable year; or

The custodial parent signs a written declaration that such custodial parent will not claim the credit of this section with respect to such child for any taxable year beginning in such calendar year and the noncustodial parent attaches such written declaration to the noncustodial parent’s income tax return for the taxable year beginning during such calendar year.

§ 63-3029M. Income tax credit for employer contributions to Idaho college savings program accounts.

Subject to the limitations of this section, for taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2020, there shall be allowed to an employer a nonrefundable credit against taxes imposed by this chapter for each of the employer’s contributions to an employee’s Idaho college savings program account established pursuant to chapter 54, title 33, Idaho Code.

The credit allowed by this section shall be in the amount of twenty percent (20%) of the total contributions per employee, but may not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per employee, per taxable year.

If the amount of a tax credit under this section exceeds a taxpayer’s tax liability under this chapter for a taxable year, the amount of the tax credit that exceeds the taxpayer’s income tax liability may be carried forward for a period that does not exceed the next five (5) taxable years.

As used in this section, the term “employee” means a person who, during the taxable year for which the credit is allowed, is subject to Idaho income tax withholding, whether or not any amounts are required to be withheld, and who is covered by the employer for unemployment insurance purposes under chapter 13, title 72, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3029N, 63-3039O. [Reserved.]

When a taxpayer subject to any taxes imposed under this chapter is entitled to two (2) or more credits against such taxes, the priority of credits shall be determined in the following order:

Nonrefundable credits. Nonrefundable credits shall be applied to the tax liability before application of refundable credits. If a taxpayer is entitled to more than one (1) nonrefundable credit, the credits shall be applied in the order in which the statutes authorizing the credits were enacted by the legislature.

Refundable credits. Refundable credits shall be applied to the tax liability after application of any nonrefundable credits.

§ 63-3029Q — 63-3029DD. [Reserved.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2012, ch. 233, § 3, effective January 1, 2017.